Vermont statutes. Title 33 Human Services
Subchapter 1B. Complementary Legislation to Nonparticipating Tobacco Manufacturers Statutes

§ 1915.
Findings and purpose.

The General Assembly finds that the provisions of this subchapter will enhance compliance with subchapter 1A of this chapter and further the policies and purposes of that subchapter.

The provisions of this subchapter are not intended to amend and shall not be interpreted as amending subchapter 1A of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 14

, § 1.

§ 1916.
Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Brand family” means all styles of cigarettes sold under the same trademark and differentiated from one another by means of additional modifiers or descriptors, including “menthol,” “lights,” “kings,” and “100s,” and includes a brand name (alone or in conjunction with any other word), trademark, logo, symbol, motto, selling message, recognizable pattern of colors, or any other indicia of product identification identical or similar to, or identifiable with, a previously known brand of cigarettes.

“Cigarette” has the same meaning as in subdivision 1913(4) of this title.

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Taxes.

“Wholesale dealer” has the same meaning as in

32 V.S.A. § 7702(16)

.

“Master Settlement Agreement” has the same meaning as in subdivision 1913(5) of this title.

“Nonparticipating manufacturer” means any tobacco product manufacturer that is not a participating manufacturer.

“Participating manufacturer” has the same meaning as in section II(jj) of the Master Settlement Agreement and all amendments to the Agreement.

“Qualified escrow fund” has the same meaning as in subdivision 1913(6) of this title.

“Retail dealer” has the same meaning as in

32 V.S.A. § 7702(10)

.

[Repealed.]

“Tobacco product manufacturer” has the same meaning as in subdivision 1913(9) of this title.

“Units sold” has the same meaning as in subdivision 1913(10) of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 14

, § 1; amended

2015, No. 57

, § 83, eff. June 11, 2015;

2021, No. 20

, § 301.

§ 1917.
Certifications.

Every tobacco product manufacturer whose cigarettes are sold in this State, whether directly or through a licensed wholesale dealer, retailer, or similar intermediary or intermediaries, shall execute and deliver on a form prescribed by the Attorney General a certification to the Attorney General not later than April 30 each year certifying under penalty of perjury that, as of the date of such certification, such tobacco product manufacturer either is a participating manufacturer or is in full compliance with subchapter 1A of this chapter, including all quarterly installment payments required by section 1922 of this title.

A participating manufacturer shall:

include in its certification a list of its brand families;

update its list 30 calendar days prior to any addition to or modification of its brand families by executing and delivering a supplemental certification to the Attorney General.

A nonparticipating manufacturer shall:

include in its certification:

a list of all of its brand families and the number of units sold for each brand family that were sold in the State during the previous calendar year;

a list of all of its brand families that have been sold in the State during the current calendar year;

a list of any brand family sold in the State during the preceding calendar year that is no longer being sold in the State as of the date of such certification; and

the name and business address of any other tobacco product manufacturer that has manufactured in the past calendar year or is currently manufacturing or selling any brand family listed in the nonparticipating manufacturer’s certification;

also certify:

that the nonparticipating manufacturer is registered to do business in the State or has appointed an in-state agent for service of process and provided notice thereof as required by this subchapter;

that the nonparticipating manufacturer has established and continues to maintain a qualified escrow fund; has executed an escrow agreement that both governs the qualified escrow fund and has been reviewed and approved by the Attorney General; and is in full compliance with subchapter 1A of this chapter;

the following information with respect to each qualified escrow fund established pursuant to subchapter 1A of this chapter:

the name, address, and telephone number of the financial institution where the nonparticipating manufacturer has established such qualified escrow fund;

the account number of such qualified escrow fund and any subaccount number for the State;

the amount the nonparticipating manufacturer placed in such fund for cigarettes sold in the State during the preceding calendar year, the dates and amount of each deposit, and evidence or verification as may be deemed necessary by the Attorney General to confirm the foregoing; and

the amounts and dates of any withdrawal or transfer of funds the nonparticipating manufacturer made at any time from the fund; and

that the nonparticipating manufacturer is in full compliance with this subchapter and any rules adopted pursuant to this subchapter; and

update its list of brand families 30 calendar days prior to any addition or modification of its brand families by executing and delivering supplemental certification to the Attorney General.

A tobacco product manufacturer may not include a brand family in its certification unless:
(d) (1) A tobacco product manufacturer may not include a brand family in its certification unless:

in the case of a participating manufacturer, the participating manufacturer affirms that the brand family shall be deemed to be its cigarettes for purposes of calculating its payments under the Master Settlement Agreement for the relevant year, in the volume and shares determined pursuant to the Master Settlement Agreement; and

in the case of a nonparticipating manufacturer, the nonparticipating manufacturer affirms that the brand family shall be deemed to be its cigarettes for purposes of subchapter 1A of this chapter.

Nothing in this subsection shall be construed as limiting or otherwise affecting the State’s right to contend that the manufacture or sale of a brand family constitutes cigarettes of a different tobacco product manufacturer for purposes of calculating payments under the Master Settlement Agreement or for purposes of subchapter 1A of this chapter.

A tobacco product manufacturer shall maintain all invoices and documentation of sales and other such information relied upon for such certification for a period of five years from the date the certification is executed, unless otherwise required by law to maintain them for a greater period of time.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 14

, § 1; amended

2015, No. 57

, § 84, eff. June 11, 2015;

2021, No. 20

, § 302.

§ 1918.
Directory of cigarettes approved for stamping and sale.

The Attorney General shall develop and publish on its website a directory listing all tobacco product manufacturers that have provided current and accurate certifications conforming to the requirements of this subchapter (the “directory”) and all brand families that are listed in such certifications, except as noted in this subsection.

The Attorney General shall not include or retain in such directory any brand family of any tobacco product manufacturer that has failed to provide the required certification or whose certification the Attorney General determines is not in compliance with this subchapter, unless the Attorney General determines that such violation has been cured to the satisfaction of the Attorney General.

Neither a tobacco product manufacturer nor any brand family of the tobacco product manufacturer shall be included or retained in the directory if the Attorney General concludes that either:

any escrow funds required to be deposited pursuant to subchapter 1A of this chapter for any period related to any brand family, whether or not listed by such tobacco product manufacturer in its certification, have not been placed into a qualified escrow fund governed by an escrow agreement that has been approved by the Attorney General; or

any outstanding judgment, including interest thereon, obtained pursuant to subchapter 1A of this chapter related to that tobacco product manufacturer or any brand family of the tobacco product manufacturer has not been fully satisfied.

The Attorney General shall update the directory in order to correct mistakes and add or remove a tobacco product manufacturer or brand family to keep the directory in conformity with the requirements of this subchapter, and the Attorney General shall transmit by e-mail or other practicable means to each stamping agent, and to any other entity that registers with the Department of Taxes or the Attorney General requesting receipt of the same, notice at least 30 days prior to any removal from the directory of any tobacco product manufacturer or brand family.

Unless otherwise provided by agreement between a licensed wholesale dealer and a tobacco product manufacturer, a licensed wholesale dealer shall be entitled to a refund from a tobacco product manufacturer for any money paid by the licensed wholesale dealer to the tobacco product manufacturer for any cigarettes of that tobacco product manufacturer still in the possession of the licensed wholesale dealer on the date of the Attorney General’s removal from the directory of that tobacco product manufacturer or the individual styles or brands of cigarettes of that tobacco product manufacturer. Also, unless otherwise provided by agreement between a retail dealer and a licensed wholesale dealer or a tobacco product manufacturer, a retail dealer shall be entitled to a refund from either a licensed wholesale dealer or a tobacco product manufacturer for any money paid by the retail dealer to the licensed wholesale dealer or tobacco product manufacturer for any cigarettes of that licensed wholesale dealer or tobacco product manufacturer still in the possession of the retail dealer on the date of the Attorney General’s removal from the directory of that tobacco product manufacturer or the individual styles or brands of cigarettes of that tobacco product manufacturer. The Attorney General shall not restore to the directory a tobacco product manufacturer or any individual styles or brands or cigarettes or, if applicable, brand families of that tobacco product manufacturer until the tobacco product manufacturer has paid all licensed wholesale dealers any refund due pursuant to this section.

The Commissioner shall refund to a licensed wholesale dealer any tax paid under 32 V.S.A. chapter 205 on products no longer saleable in the State under this subchapter.

A determination of the Attorney General not to list or to remove from the directory a tobacco product manufacturer, an individual style or brand of cigarette or, if applicable, brand family is a final agency decision with the same status as an agency decision or order in a contested case under the Vermont Administrative Procedure Act. A tobacco product manufacturer aggrieved by a determination of the Attorney General under this section may appeal to the Superior Court in Washington County, which shall review the matter pursuant to

3 V.S.A. § 815

.

If a nonparticipating manufacturer who has not been listed on the directory for the previous three years files a certification pursuant to this section, or if the Attorney General determines that a nonparticipating manufacturer who has filed a certification pursuant to this section poses an elevated risk for noncompliance with sections 1912-1914 of this title, neither the nonparticipating manufacturer nor any of its brand families shall be included or retained on the directory unless and until the nonparticipating manufacturer or its U.S. importer that undertakes joint and several liability for the manufacturer’s performance in accordance with section 1925 of this title and amendments to that section has posted a bond in accordance with this subsection. Proof of the bond shall be submitted with the certification on a form approved by the Attorney General.

The bond required under this subsection shall be written in favor of the State of Vermont and shall be conditioned on the performance by the nonparticipating manufacturer or its U.S. importer that undertakes joint and several liability for the manufacturer’s performance in accordance with sections 1912-1914 and 1925 of this title. The bond shall be issued by a surety company in good standing and authorized to transact business in this State to secure the payment of any escrow due or that may become due from the nonparticipating manufacturer or its U.S. importer. The bond shall be maintained as a condition to the nonparticipating manufacturer and its brand families being included on the directory and shall remain in place for the pendency of such listing.

The bond required shall be $20,000.00 for a nonparticipating manufacturer that has not been listed on the Vermont directory for at least three years prior to the nonparticipating manufacturer’s application for certification.

The bond required shall be $50,000.00 for a nonparticipating manufacturer that poses an elevated risk for noncompliance with sections 1912-1914 of this title.

A nonparticipating manufacturer shall be deemed to pose an elevated risk for noncompliance with sections 1912-1914 of this title if it:

failed in the previous three years to make a full and timely escrow deposit due pursuant to section 1914 of this title, unless the failure was promptly cured upon notice;

was involuntarily removed from any state’s directory, unless the removal was determined to have been erroneous or illegal; or

has litigation pending against it in any state for escrow or for penalties, costs, or attorney’s fees related to noncompliance with any state’s escrow laws.

If a nonparticipating manufacturer that has posted a bond has failed to make or to have made on its behalf by an entity with joint and several liability escrow deposits equal to the full amount owed for a quarter within 15 days following the due date for the quarter under sections 1914 and 1925 of this title, the State may execute upon the bond first to recover delinquent escrow, which amount shall be deposited into a qualified escrow account under section 1914, and then to recover civil penalties and costs authorized under that section. Escrow obligations above the amount collected on the bond remain due from that nonparticipating manufacturer and, as provided in section 1925 of this title, from importers that sold its cigarettes in the calendar quarter.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 14

, § 1; amended

2003, No. 113

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2013, No. 14

, § 22;

2015, No. 57

, § 85, eff. June 11, 2015;

2021, No. 20

, § 303.

§ 1919.
Prohibition against the stamping and sale of cigarettes not included in the directory.

No person shall affix a tax stamp to or sell or offer for sale in this State any package or container of cigarettes manufactured by a tobacco product manufacturer or belonging to a brand family that is not included in the directory, or sell, offer, or possess for sale, in this State, cigarettes of a tobacco product manufacturer or brand family not included in the directory.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 14

, § 1.

§ 1920.
Agent for service of process.

Any nonresident or foreign nonparticipating manufacturer that has not registered to do business in the State as a foreign corporation or other business entity shall, as a condition precedent to having its brand families included or retained in the directory, appoint and continually engage without interruption the services of an agent in this State to act as agent for the service of process on whom all process, and any action or proceeding against it concerning or arising out of the enforcement of this subchapter or subchapter 1A of this chapter, or both, may be served in any manner authorized by law. Such service shall constitute legal and valid service of process on the nonparticipating manufacturer. The nonparticipating manufacturer shall provide the name, address, telephone number, and satisfactory proof of the appointment and availability of such agent to the Attorney General. The Secretary of State shall be designated as agent for service of process for importers of nonparticipating manufacturers located outside the United States. Service shall be made upon the Secretary of State in accordance with the provisions of

12 V.S.A. §§ 851

and 852.

The nonparticipating manufacturer shall provide notice to the Attorney General 30 calendar days prior to termination of the authority of any such agent and shall further provide proof to the satisfaction of the Attorney General of the appointment of a new agent no less than five calendar days prior to the termination of an existing agent appointment. In the event an agent terminates an agent appointment, the nonparticipating manufacturer shall notify the Attorney General of said termination within five calendar days and shall include proof to the satisfaction of the Attorney General of the appointment of a new agent.

Any nonparticipating manufacturer whose cigarettes are sold in this State who has not appointed and engaged an agent as required by this section shall be deemed to have appointed the Secretary of State as such agent and may be proceeded against in courts of this State by service of process upon the Secretary of State; provided, however, that the appointment of the Secretary of State as such agent shall not satisfy the condition precedent, required by subsection (a) of this section, for having the individual styles or brands of cigarettes or, if applicable, brand families of the nonparticipating manufacturer included or retained in the directory.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 14

, § 1; amended

2011, No. 166

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

2021, No. 20

, § 304.

§ 1921.
Reporting and sharing of information.

At the date specified in

32 V.S.A. § 7785

or 7813, for monthly reports from licensed wholesale dealers, or at such date and frequency as the Commissioner may require for other licensed wholesale dealers, which will be at least quarterly, each licensed wholesale dealer shall submit such information as the Commissioner requires to facilitate compliance with subchapter 1A of this chapter and this subchapter, including a list by brand family of the total number of cigarettes, or, in the case of roll-your-own tobacco, the equivalent stick count, as determined pursuant to the formula set forth in subchapter 1A of this chapter, for which the licensed wholesale dealer affixed stamps during the reporting period or otherwise paid the tax due for such cigarettes. Licensed wholesale dealers shall maintain, and make available to the Commissioner, all documentation and other information relied upon in reporting to the Commissioner for a period of six years.

The Attorney General may require at any time from a nonparticipating manufacturer proof from the financial institution in which a tobacco product manufacturer has established a qualified escrow fund for the purpose of compliance with subchapter 1A of this chapter of the amount of money being held in such fund on behalf of the State and the dates of deposits, and listing the amounts of all withdrawals from such fund and the dates thereof; any such nonparticipating manufacturer shall provide the requisite proof within 10 business days of the date it is requested. In the event that a nonparticipating manufacturer fails to provide the requisite proof within said time period, the Attorney General shall remove the nonparticipating manufacturer and all of its styles or brands of cigarettes from the directory.

The Attorney General may require a licensed wholesale dealer or tobacco product manufacturer to submit any additional information, including samples of the packaging or labeling of each brand family, as is necessary to enable the Attorney General to determine whether a tobacco product manufacturer is in compliance with this subchapter and subchapter 1A of this chapter.

The Attorney General is authorized to disclose to the Commissioner and, notwithstanding the provisions of 32 V.S.A. chapter 103, the Commissioner is authorized to disclose to the Attorney General any information received under this subchapter or subchapter 1A of this chapter, if such information is requested by the other for the purposes of determining compliance with or enforcing the provisions of those statutes. The Attorney General and Commissioner shall share with each other the information received under this subchapter or subchapter 1A of this chapter, and may share such information with other federal, State, or local agencies as necessary for the purposes of enforcement of this subchapter, the State’s nonparticipating tobacco manufacturers’ statutes, or corresponding laws of other states.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 14

, § 1; amended

2003, No. 113

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2015, No. 57

, § 86, eff. June 11, 2015.

§ 1922.
Quarterly escrow deposits.

To promote compliance with the provisions of this subchapter, the Attorney General may adopt rules requiring a nonparticipating manufacturer to make the escrow deposits required by subchapter 1A of this chapter in quarterly installments during the year in which the sales covered by such deposits are made.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 14

, § 1; amended

2015, No. 23

, § 137.

§ 1923.
Penalties and other remedies.

In addition to or in lieu of any other civil or criminal remedy provided by law, upon a determination that a stamping agent has violated this subchapter or any rule adopted pursuant to this subchapter, the Attorney General may, for each violation of this subchapter, also impose a civil penalty in an amount not to exceed the greater of 500 percent of the retail value of the cigarettes sold, offered for sale, or possessed for sale in violation of this subchapter or $5,000.00. Each stamp affixed and each sale or offer to sell cigarettes in violation of section 1919 of this subchapter shall constitute a separate violation.

The Attorney General may seek an injunction to restrain a threatened or actual violation of this subchapter by a stamping agent and to compel the stamping agent to comply with the provisions of this subchapter. In any action brought pursuant to this section, the State shall be entitled to recover the costs of investigation, expert witness fees, costs of the action, and reasonable attorney’s fees.

It shall be unlawful for a person to:

Sell or distribute cigarettes that the person knows or should know are intended for distribution or sale in the State in violation of this subchapter.

Acquire, hold, own, possess, transport, import, or cause to be imported cigarettes that the person knows or should know are intended for distribution or sale in the State in violation of this subchapter. A violation of this section shall be a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than one year and a fine of not more than $5,000.00, or both.

A person who violates section 1919 of this title engages in an unfair and deceptive trade practice in violation of the State’s Consumer Protection Act,

9 V.S.A. § 2451

et seq.

If a court determines that a person has violated the provisions of this subchapter, the court shall order any profits, gain, gross receipts, or other benefit from the violation to be disgorged and paid to the State Treasurer for deposit in the Tobacco Litigation Settlement Fund established pursuant to

32 V.S.A. § 435a

.

Unless otherwise expressly provided, the penalties or remedies, or both, provided by this subchapter are cumulative to each other and to the penalties or remedies, or both, available under all other laws of this State.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 14

, § 1; amended

2011, No. 109

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. May 8, 2012;

2011, No. 136

(Adj. Sess.), § 1b, eff. May 18, 2012;

2021, No. 20

, § 305.

§ 1924.
Miscellaneous provisions.

The first report of stamping agents required by section 1921 of this title shall be due 30 days after the effective date of this subchapter; the initial certification of a tobacco product manufacturer required by section 1917 of this title shall be due 45 days after the effective date of this subchapter; and the directory described in section 1918 of this title shall be published or made available within 120 days after the effective date of this subchapter.

Both the Attorney General and the Commissioner may adopt rules necessary to effect the purposes of this subchapter.

In any action brought by the State to enforce the provisions of this subchapter, the State shall be entitled to recover the costs of investigation, expert witness fees, costs of the action, and reasonable attorney’s fees.

If a court of competent jurisdiction finds that the provisions of this subchapter and subchapter 1A of this chapter conflict and cannot be harmonized, then such provisions of subchapter 1A shall control. If any section, subsection, subdivision, sentence, or phrase of this subchapter causes subchapter 1A of this chapter to no longer constitute a qualifying act or model statute, as those terms are defined in the Master Settlement Agreement, then that portion of this subchapter shall not apply. If any section, subsection, subdivision, sentence, or phrase of this subchapter is for any reason held to be invalid, unlawful, or unconstitutional, such decision shall not affect the validity of the remaining portions of this subchapter or any part thereof.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 14

, § 1; amended

2021, No. 20

, § 306.

§ 1925.
Joint and several liability of importers on nonparticipating manufacturer’s brand families.

Each nonparticipating manufacturer located outside the United States and each importer of any nonparticipating manufacturer’s brand families that are sold in the State shall bear joint and several liability for the deposit of all escrow due and payment of all penalties, costs, and attorney’s fees imposed under this subchapter. The nonparticipating manufacturer, as a condition to being listed on the directory, shall provide a declaration on a form prescribed by the Attorney General from each of its importers of any of its brand families to be sold in the State that the importer accepts joint and several liability for all escrow deposits due pursuant to section 1914 of this title and for all penalties, costs, and attorney’s fees assessed under section 1914 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 166

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. May 16, 2012.